California statutes. Civil Code
(c) For purposes of this section, a “licensed person” means a depository institution chartered under federal or state law, a person covered by the licensing requirements of Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000) or Division 20 (commencing with Section 50000) of the Financial Code, or a person licensed pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 352, Sec. 6.   (AB 948)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.6h.

(a) A seller of a single-family residential property who accepts an offer for the sale of the single-family residential property within 18 months from the date that title for the single-family residential property
 was transferred to the seller shall disclose, in addition to any other disclosure required pursuant to this article, to the buyer both of the following:

(1) Any room additions, structural modifications, other alterations, or repairs made to the property since title to the property was transferred to the seller that were performed by a contractor with whom the seller entered into a contract.

(2) The name of each contractor with whom the seller entered into a contract with for the room additions, structural modifications, other alterations, or repairs
 disclosed in paragraph (1) and any contact information for the contractor provided by the contractor to the seller. The obligation to provide the name of the contractor shall only apply to contracts where the aggregate contract price for labor, material, and all other items for the project or undertaking is in excess of the dollar amount specified in Section 7027.2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) The seller’s obligation to disclose the room additions, structural modifications, other alterations, or repairs made to the property performed by a contractor may also be satisfied by providing a list of room additions, structural modifications, other alterations, or repairs performed by, and provided by, the contractor with whom the seller contracted for the room additions, structural modifications, other alterations, or repairs.

(c) (1) If the seller obtained a permit for any room additions, structural modifications, other alterations, or repairs provided to the buyer pursuant to subdivision (a), the seller shall provide a copy of the permit to the buyer.

(2) If the seller contracted with a third party for any room additions, structural modifications, or repairs, and the seller was not provided with a copy of any permits obtained, the seller may satisfy the obligation in paragraph (1) by informing the buyer that any information on permits may be obtained from the third party and providing the contact
 information for the third party provided by the third party to the seller.

(d) This section shall apply to the sale of a single-family residential property where the seller accepts an offer from a buyer to purchase the property on or after July 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 95, Sec. 1.   (AB 968)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.6i.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), on or after January 1, 2026, in addition to any other disclosure required pursuant to this article, the seller of any real property subject to this article, or the seller’s agent, shall deliver to the prospective buyer a disclosure statement that provides as follows: “In a purchase of real property, it may be advisable to obtain an inspection by a qualified professional of the electrical system(s) of any buildings, including, but
 not limited to, the main service panel, the subpanel(s), and wiring. Substandard, recalled, or faulty wiring may cause a fire risk and may make it difficult to obtain property insurance. Limited electrical capacity may make it difficult to support future electrical additions to the building(s), such as solar generation, electric space heating, electric water heating, or electric vehicle charging equipment.”

(b) This section does not apply to the sale of a building within three years of the issuance of the certificate of occupancy for the building.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 443, Sec. 1.   (SB 382)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.6j.

On or after January 1, 2026, the seller of a single-family residential property subject to this article shall disclose, in writing, the existence of any state or local requirements or restrictions relating to the future replacement of existing gas-powered appliances that are being transferred with the property to the extent they or their agent are aware of those requirements or restrictions. For purposes of this section, “gas-powered appliance” includes, but is not limited to, appliances fueled by natural gas or liquid propane.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 443, Sec. 2.   (SB 382)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.6k.

(a) In addition to any other disclosure required pursuant to this article, it shall be the sole responsibility of a seller of a single-family residential property subject to this article who has actual knowledge of the existence of any residue from smoking tobacco or nicotine products, or any history of occupants smoking tobacco or nicotine products on the property, to disclose that knowledge to the buyer in writing.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following apply:

(1) “Residue from smoking tobacco or nicotine products” means a chemical accumulation resulting from the smoking of tobacco or nicotine products, and may be indicated by the smell of tobacco smoke or by test results that indicate elevated levels of nicotine on surfaces or in dust.

(2) “Smoking tobacco or nicotine products” includes the use of an electronic cigarette or vape device for inhaling an aerosol.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 263, Sec. 3.   (AB 455)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.7.

Each disclosure required by this article and each act which may be performed in making the disclosure, shall be made in good faith. For purposes of this article, “good faith” means honesty in fact in the conduct of the transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1574, Sec. 2.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1574.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.8.

The specification of items for disclosure in this article does not limit or abridge any obligation for disclosure created by any other provision of law or which may exist in order to avoid fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit in the transfer transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1574, Sec. 2.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1574.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.9.

Any disclosure made pursuant to this article may be amended in writing by the seller or his or her agent, but the amendment shall be subject to Section 1102.3 or 1102.3a.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 907, Sec. 16.   (AB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.10.

Delivery of disclosures required by this article shall be by personal delivery to the tranferee or by mail to the prospective transferee. For the purposes of this article, delivery to the spouse of a transferee shall be deemed delivery to the transferee, unless provided otherwise by contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1574, Sec. 2.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1574.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.11.

Any person or entity, other than a real estate licensee licensed pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code, acting in the capacity of an escrow agent for the transfer of real property subject to this article shall not be deemed the agent of the transferor or transferee for purposes of the disclosure requirements of this article, unless the person or entity is empowered to so act by an express written agreement to that effect. The extent of such an agency shall be governed by the written agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1574, Sec. 2.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1574.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.12.

(a) If more than one licensed real estate broker is acting as an agent in a transaction subject to this article, the broker who has obtained the offer made by the transferee shall, except as otherwise provided in this article, deliver the disclosure required by this article to the transferee, unless the transferor has given other written instructions for delivery.

(b) If a licensed real estate broker responsible for delivering the disclosures under this section cannot obtain the disclosure document required and does not have
 written assurance from the transferee that the disclosure has been received, the broker shall advise the transferee in writing of his or her rights to the disclosure. A licensed real estate broker responsible for delivering disclosures under this section shall maintain a record of the action taken to effect compliance in accordance with Section 10148 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 460, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.13.

No transfer subject to this article shall be invalidated solely because of the failure of any person to comply with any provision of this article. However, any person who willfully or negligently violates or fails to perform any duty prescribed by any provision of this article shall be liable in the amount of actual damages suffered by a transferee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1574, Sec. 2.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1574.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.15.

The seller of residential real property subject to this article who has actual knowledge of any former federal or state ordnance locations within the neighborhood area shall give written notice of that knowledge as soon as practicable before transfer of title.

For purposes of this section, “former federal or state ordnance locations” means an area identified by an agency or instrumentality of the federal or state government as an area once used for military training purposes which may contain potentially explosive munitions. “Neighborhood area” means within one mile of
 the residential real property.

The disclosure required by this section does not limit or abridge any obligation for disclosure created by any other law or that may exist in order to avoid fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit in the transfer transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 294, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.155.

(a) (1) The seller of single-family residential real property subject to this article shall disclose, in writing, that Section 1101.4 requires that California single-family residences be equipped with water-conserving plumbing fixtures on or after January 1, 2017, and shall disclose whether the property includes any noncompliant plumbing fixtures as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1101.3.

(2) The seller shall affirm that this representation is that of the seller and not a representation of any agent, and that this disclosure is not intended to be part of any contract between the buyer and the seller. The seller shall further affirm that this disclosure is not a warranty of any kind by the seller or any agent representing any principal in the transaction and is not a substitute for any inspections or warranties that any principal may wish to obtain.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 907, Sec. 18.   (AB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.156.

On or after January 1, 2025, in addition to any other disclosure required pursuant to this article, a seller of any real property who received domestic water storage tank assistance pursuant to Section 13194 of the Water Code, or is aware the real property received such assistance and the real property currently still has the domestic water storage tank, shall deliver to the prospective buyer a disclosure statement that includes all of the following information in substantially the following form:

(a) This property has a domestic water storage tank provided by a county, community water system, local public agency, or nonprofit organization, pursuant to Section 13194 of the Water Code.

(b) The
 domestic water storage tank was made available to households that had a private water well that had gone dry, or had been destroyed due to drought, wildfire, other natural disasters, or was otherwise nonfunctioning.

(c) The domestic water storage tank provided pursuant to Section 13194 of the Water Code might not convey with the real property.

(d) Due to the water well issues that led to this property obtaining assistance pursuant to Section 13194 of the Water Code, the buyer is advised to have an inspection of the water well and to have a professional evaluate the availability of water to the property to ensure it suits the purposes for which the buyer is purchasing the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 21, Sec. 1.   (SB 1366)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.16.

The disclosure of the existence of any window security bars and any safety release mechanism on those window security bars shall be made pursuant to Section 1102.6 or 1102.6a of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.17.

The seller of residential real property subject to this article who has actual knowledge that the property is adjacent to, or zoned to allow, an industrial use described in Section 731a of the Code of Civil Procedure, or affected by a nuisance created by such a use, shall give written notice of that knowledge as soon as practicable before transfer of title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 66, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.18.

The provisions of subdivision (d) of Section 1102.1 shall apply to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 907, Sec. 19.   (AB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.19.

(a) On and after July 1, 2021, a seller of a real property subject to this article that is located in a high or very high fire hazard severity zone, as identified by the Director of Forestry and Fire Protection pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Article 9 (commencing with Section 4201) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Public Resources Code, shall provide to the buyer documentation stating that the property is in compliance with Section 4291 of the
 Public Resources Code or local vegetation management ordinances, as follows:

(1) In a local jurisdiction that has enacted an ordinance requiring an owner of real property to obtain documentation that the property is in compliance with Section 4291 of the Public Resources Code or a local vegetation management ordinance, the seller shall provide the buyer with a copy of the documentation that complies with the requirements of that local ordinance and information on the local agency from which a copy of that documentation may be obtained.

(2) In a local jurisdiction that has not enacted an ordinance for an owner of real property to obtain documentation that a property is in compliance with Section 4291 of the Public Resources Code or a local vegetation management ordinance, and if a state or local agency, or other government entity, or other qualified nonprofit entity, provides an
 inspection with documentation for the jurisdiction in which the property is located, the seller shall provide the buyer with the documentation obtained in the six-month period preceding the date the seller enters into a transaction to sell that real property and provide information on the local agency from which a copy of that documentation may be obtained.

(b) On and after July 1, 2021, if the seller of a real property described in subdivision (a) has not obtained documentation of compliance in accordance with paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a), the seller and the buyer shall enter into a written agreement pursuant to which the buyer agrees to obtain documentation of compliance with Section 4291 of the Public Resources Code or a local vegetation management ordinance as follows:

(1) In a local jurisdiction that has enacted an ordinance requiring an owner or buyer to obtain
 documentation of compliance with Section 4291 of the Public Resources Code or a local vegetation management ordinance, the buyer shall comply with that ordinance.

(2) In a local jurisdiction that has not enacted an ordinance requiring an owner or buyer to obtain documentation of compliance, and if a state or local agency, or other government entity, or other qualified nonprofit entity, provides an inspection with documentation for the jurisdiction in which the property is located, the buyer shall obtain documentation of compliance within one year of the date of the close of escrow.

(c) Nothing in this section, including the existence of an agreement between a buyer and seller pursuant to subdivision (b), shall limit the ability of a state or local agency to enforce defensible space requirements pursuant to Section 51182 of the Government Code, Section 4291 of the Public Resources
 Code, or other applicable statutes, regulations, and local ordinances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 36, Sec. 12.   (AB 3364)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.7. Disclosure of Natural and Environmental Hazards, Right-to-Farm, and Other Disclosures Upon Transfer of Residential Property [1103. - 1103.15.]

1103.

(a) For purpose of this article, the definitions in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code shall apply.

(b) Except as provided in Section 1103.1, this article applies to a sale, exchange, real property sales contract, as defined in Section 2985, lease with an option to purchase, any other
 option to purchase, or ground lease coupled with improvements, of any single-family residential real property.

(c) This article shall apply to the transactions described in subdivision (b) only if the seller or his or her agent is required by one or more of the following to disclose the property’s location within a hazard zone:

(1) A seller’s agent for a seller of real property that is located within a special flood hazard area (any type Zone “A” or “V”) designated by the Federal Emergency Management Agency, or the seller if the seller is acting without a seller’s agent, shall disclose to any prospective buyer the fact that the property is located within a special flood hazard area if either:

(A) The seller, or the seller’s agent, has actual knowledge that the property is within a special flood hazard area.

(B) The local jurisdiction has compiled a list, by parcel, of properties that are within the special flood hazard area and a notice has been posted at the offices of the county recorder, county assessor, and county planning agency that identifies the location of the parcel list.

(2) A seller’s agent for a seller of real property that is located within an area of potential flooding designated pursuant to Section 6161 of the Water Code, or the seller if the seller is acting without a seller’s agent, shall disclose to any prospective buyer the fact that the property is located within an area of potential flooding if either:

(A) The seller, or the seller’s agent, has actual knowledge that the property is within an inundation area.

(B) The local jurisdiction
 has compiled a list, by parcel, of properties that are within the inundation area and a notice has been posted at the offices of the county recorder, county assessor, and county planning agency that identifies the location of the parcel list.

(3) A seller of real property that is located within a very high fire hazard severity zone, designated pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code, or the seller’s agent, shall disclose to any prospective buyer the fact that the property is located within a very high fire hazard severity zone and is subject to the requirements of Section 51182 of the Government Code if either:

(A) The seller or the seller’s agent, has actual knowledge that the property is within a very high fire hazard severity zone.

(B) A map that includes the property has been provided to the local agency
 pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code and a notice has been posted at the offices of the county recorder, county assessor, and county planning agency that identifies the location of the map and any information regarding changes to the map received by the local agency.

(4) A seller’s agent for a seller of real property that is located within an earthquake fault zone, designated pursuant to Section 2622 of the Public Resources Code, or the seller, if the seller is acting without an agent, shall disclose to any prospective buyer the fact that the property is located within a delineated earthquake fault zone if either:

(A) The seller, or the seller’s agent, has actual knowledge that the property is within a delineated earthquake fault zone.

(B) A map that includes the property has been provided to the city or
 county pursuant to Section 2622 of the Public Resources Code and a notice has been posted at the offices of the county recorder, county assessor, and county planning agency that identifies the location of the map and any information regarding changes to the map received by the county.

(5) A seller’s agent for a seller of real property that is located within a seismic hazard zone, designated pursuant to Section 2696 of the Public Resources Code, or the seller if the seller is acting without an agent, shall disclose to any prospective buyer the fact that the property is located within a seismic hazard zone if either:

(A) The seller, or the seller’s agent, has actual knowledge that the property is within a seismic hazard zone.

(B) A map that includes the property has been provided to the city or county pursuant to
 Section 2696 of the Public Resources Code and a notice has been posted at the offices of the county recorder, county assessor, and county planning agency that identifies the location of the map and any information regarding changes to the map received by the county.

(6) A seller of real property that is located within a state responsibility area determined by the board, pursuant to Section 4125 of the Public Resources Code, or the seller’s agent, shall disclose to any prospective buyer the fact that the property is located within a wildland area that may contain substantial forest fire risks and hazards and is subject to the requirements of Section 4291 of the Public Resources Code if either:

(A) The seller, or the seller’s agent, has actual knowledge that the property is within a wildland fire zone.

(B) A map that
 includes the property has been provided to the city or county pursuant to Section 4125 of the Public Resources Code and a notice has been posted at the offices of the county recorder, county assessor, and county planning agency that identifies the location of the map and any information regarding changes to the map received by the county.

(d) Any waiver of the requirements of this article is void as against public policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 907, Sec. 20.   (AB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1103.1.

(a) This article does not apply to the following sales:

(1) Sales or transfers pursuant to court order, including, but not limited to, sales ordered by a probate court in administration of an estate, sales pursuant to a writ of execution, sales by any foreclosure sale, sales by a trustee in bankruptcy, sales by eminent domain, and sales resulting from a decree for specific performance.

(2) Sales or transfers to a mortgagee by a mortgagor or successor in interest who is in default, sales to a beneficiary of a deed of trust by a trustor or successor in interest who is in default, transfers by any foreclosure sale after default, any foreclosure sale after default in an obligation secured by a mortgage,
 sale under a power of sale or any foreclosure sale under a decree of foreclosure after default in an obligation secured by a deed of trust or secured by any other instrument containing a power of sale, or sales by a mortgagee or a beneficiary under a deed of trust who has acquired the real property at a sale conducted pursuant to a power of sale under a mortgage or deed of trust or a sale pursuant to a decree of foreclosure or has acquired the real property by a deed in lieu of foreclosure.

(3) Sales or transfers by a fiduciary in the course of the administration of a trust, guardianship, conservatorship, or decedent’s estate. This exemption shall not apply to a sale if the trustee is a natural person who is a trustee of a revocable trust and the seller is a former owner of the property or an occupant in possession of the property within the preceding year.

(4) Sales or transfers
 from one coowner to one or more other coowners.

(5) Sales or transfers made to a spouse, or to a person or persons in the line of consanguinity of one or more of the sellers.

(6) Sales or transfers between spouses resulting from a judgment of dissolution of marriage or of legal separation of the parties or from a property settlement agreement incidental to that judgment.

(7) Sales or transfers by the Controller in the course of administering Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(8) Sales or transfers under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3691) or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 3771) of Part 6 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(9) Sales, transfers, or exchanges to or from any governmental entity.

(10) The sale, creation, or transfer of any lease of any duration except a lease with an option to purchase or a ground lease coupled with improvements.

(b) Sales and transfers not subject to this article may be subject to other disclosure requirements, including those under Sections 8589.3, 8589.4, and 51183.5 of the Government Code and Sections 2621.9, 2694, and 4136 of the Public Resources Code. In sales not subject to this article, agents may make required disclosures in a separate writing.

(c) Notwithstanding the definition of sale in Section 10018.5 of the Business and Professions Code and Section 2079.13, the terms “sale” and “transfer,” as they are used in this section, shall have
 their commonly understood meanings. The changes made to this section by Assembly Bill 1289 of the 2017–18 Legislative Session shall not be interpreted to change the application of the law as it read prior to January 1, 2019.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 27.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1103.2.

(a) The disclosures required by this article are set forth in, and shall be made on a copy of, the following Natural Hazard Disclosure Statement:NATURAL HAZARD DISCLOSURE STATEMENTThis statement applies to the following property:The seller and the seller’s agent(s) or a third-party consultant disclose the following information with the knowledge that even though this is not a warranty, prospective buyers may rely on this information in deciding whether and on what terms to purchase the subject property. Seller hereby authorizes any agent(s) representing any principal(s) in this action to provide a copy of this statement to any person or entity in connection with any actual or anticipated sale of the property.The following are representations made by the seller and the seller’s agent(s) based on their knowledge and maps drawn by the state and federal governments. This information is a disclosure and is not intended to be part of any contract between
 the seller and buyer.THIS REAL PROPERTY LIES WITHIN THE FOLLOWING 
HAZARDOUS AREA(S):A SPECIAL FLOOD HAZARD AREA (Any type Zone “A” or “V”) designated by the Federal Emergency Management Agency.Yes ____ No ____ Do not know and
information not
available from local 
jurisdiction ____ 
AN AREA OF POTENTIAL FLOODING shown on a dam failure inundation map pursuant to Section 8589.5 of the Government Code.Yes ____ No ____ Do not know and
information not 
available from local
jurisdiction ____A HIGH or VERY HIGH FIRE HAZARD SEVERITY ZONE (FHSZ) as identified by the Director of Forestry and Fire Protection pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Article 9 (commencing with Section 4201) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Public Resources Code. The owner of this property is subject to the maintenance requirements of Section 51182 of the Government Code.Yes ____ No ____High FHSZ in a state responsibility area ____Very High FHSZ in a state responsibility area ____Very High FHSZ in a
 local responsibility area ____A WILDLAND AREA THAT MAY CONTAIN SUBSTANTIAL FOREST FIRE RISKS AND HAZARDS pursuant to Section 4125 of the Public Resources Code. The owner of this property is subject to the maintenance requirements of Section 4291 of the Public Resources Code. Additionally, it is not the state’s responsibility to provide fire protection services to any building or structure located within the wildlands unless the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection has entered into a cooperative agreement with a local agency for those purposes pursuant to Section 4142 of the Public Resources Code.Yes ____ No ____AN EARTHQUAKE FAULT ZONE pursuant to Section 2622 of the Public Resources Code.Yes ____ No ____A SEISMIC HAZARD ZONE pursuant to Section 2696 of the Public 
Resources Code.Yes (Landslide Zone)____________ Yes (Liquefaction Zone) ______No ____ Map not yet released bystate ____THESE HAZARDS MAY LIMIT YOUR ABILITY TO DEVELOP THE REAL PROPERTY, TO OBTAIN INSURANCE, OR TO RECEIVE ASSISTANCE AFTER A DISASTER.THE MAPS ON WHICH THESE DISCLOSURES ARE BASED ESTIMATE WHERE NATURAL HAZARDS EXIST. THEY ARE NOT DEFINITIVE INDICATORS OF WHETHER OR NOT A PROPERTY WILL BE AFFECTED BY A NATURAL DISASTER. SELLER(S) AND BUYER(S) MAY WISH TO OBTAIN PROFESSIONAL ADVICE REGARDING THOSE HAZARDS AND OTHER
 HAZARDS THAT MAY AFFECT THE PROPERTY.Signature of Seller(s)DateSignature of Seller(s)DateSeller’s
 Agent(s)DateSeller’s Agent(s)DateCheck only one of the following:◻ Seller(s) and their agent(s) represent that the information herein is true and correct to the best of their knowledge as of
 the date signed by the transferor(s) and agent(s).◻ Seller(s) and their agent(s) acknowledge that they have exercised good faith in the selection of a third-party report provider as required in Section 1103.7 of the Civil Code, and that the representations made in this Natural Hazard Disclosure Statement are based upon information provided by the independent third-party disclosure provider as a substituted disclosure pursuant to Section 1103.4 of the Civil Code. Neither seller(s) nor their agent(s) (1) has independently verified the information contained in this statement and report or (2) is personally aware of any errors or inaccuracies
 in the information contained on the statement. This statement was prepared by the provider below:Third-PartyDisclosure Provider(s)DateBuyer represents that Buyer has read and understands this document. Pursuant to Section 1103.8 of the Civil Code, the representations made in this Natural Hazard Disclosure Statement do not constitute all of the
 seller’s or agent’s disclosure obligations in this transaction.Signature of Buyer(s)DateSignature of Buyer(s) Date(b) If an earthquake fault zone, seismic hazard zone, high or very high fire hazard severity zone, or wildland fire area map or accompanying information is not of sufficient accuracy
 or scale that a reasonable person can determine if the subject real property is included in a natural hazard area, the seller or seller’s agent shall mark “Yes” on the Natural Hazard Disclosure Statement. The seller’s agent may mark “No” on the Natural Hazard Disclosure Statement if the seller attaches a report prepared pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1103.4 that verifies the property is not in the hazard zone. This subdivision is not intended to limit or abridge any existing duty of the seller or the seller’s agent to exercise reasonable care in making a determination under this subdivision.

(c) If the Federal Emergency Management Agency has issued a Letter of Map Revision confirming that a property is no longer within a special flood hazard area, then the seller or seller’s agent may mark “No” on the Natural Hazard
 Disclosure Statement, even if the map has not yet been updated. The seller or seller’s agent shall attach a copy of the Letter of Map Revision to the disclosure statement.

(d) If the Federal Emergency Management Agency has issued a Letter of Map Revision confirming that a property is within a special flood hazard area and the location of the letter has been posted pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 8589.3 of the Government Code, then the seller or seller’s agent shall mark “Yes” on the Natural Hazard Disclosure Statement, even if the map has not yet been updated. The seller or seller’s agent shall attach a copy of the Letter of Map Revision to the disclosure statement.

(e) The disclosure required pursuant to this article may be provided by the seller and the seller’s
 agent in the Local Option Real Estate Transfer Disclosure Statement described in Section 1102.6a, provided that the Local Option Real Estate Transfer Disclosure Statement includes substantially the same information and substantially the same warnings that are required by this section.

(f) (1) The legal effect of a consultant’s report delivered to satisfy the exemption provided by Section 1103.4 is not changed when it is accompanied by a Natural Hazard Disclosure Statement.

(2) A consultant’s report shall always be accompanied by a completed and signed Natural Hazard Disclosure Statement.

(3) In a disclosure statement required by this section, an agent and third-party provider may cause the agent and
 third-party provider’s name to be preprinted in lieu of an original signature in the portions of the form reserved for signatures. The use of a preprinted name shall not change the legal effect of the acknowledgment.

(g) The disclosure required by this article is only a disclosure between the seller, the seller’s agent, and the prospective buyer, and shall not be used by any other party, including, but not limited to, insurance companies, lenders, or governmental agencies, for any purpose.

(h) In any transaction in which a seller has accepted, prior to June 1, 1998, an offer to purchase, the seller, or the seller’s agent shall be deemed to have complied with the requirement of subdivision (a) if the seller or agent delivers to the prospective buyer a statement that
 includes substantially the same information and warning as the Natural Hazard Disclosure Statement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 19.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1103.3.

(a) The seller of any real property subject to this article shall deliver to the prospective buyer the written statement required by this article, as follows:

(1) In the case of a sale, as soon as practicable before transfer of title.

(2) In the case of a sale by a real property sales
 contract, as defined in Section 2985, or by a lease together with an option to purchase, or a ground lease coupled with improvements, as soon as practicable before the prospective buyer’s execution of the contract. For the purpose of this subdivision, “execution” means the making or acceptance of an offer.

(b) The seller shall indicate compliance with this article either on the real property sales contract, the lease, any addendum attached thereto, or on a separate document.

(c) If any disclosure, or any material amendment of any disclosure, required to be made pursuant to this article is delivered after the execution of an offer to purchase, the prospective buyer shall have three days after delivery in person, five days after delivery by deposit in the mail, or five days after delivery of an electronic record in transactions where the parties have agreed to conduct the
 transaction by electronic means, pursuant to provisions of the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (Title 2.5 (commencing with Section 1633.1) of Part 2 of Division 3), to terminate his or her offer by delivery of a written notice of termination to the seller or the seller’s agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 907, Sec. 23.   (AB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1103.4.

(a) Neither the seller nor any seller’s agent or buyer’s agent shall be liable for any error, inaccuracy, or omission of any information delivered pursuant to this article if the error, inaccuracy, or omission was not within the personal knowledge of the seller or the seller’s agent or buyer’s agent and was based on information timely provided by public agencies or by other persons providing information as
 specified in subdivision (c) that is required to be disclosed pursuant to this article, and ordinary care was exercised in obtaining and transmitting the information.

(b) The delivery of any information required to be disclosed by this article to a prospective buyer by a public agency or other person providing information required to be disclosed pursuant to this article shall be deemed to comply with the requirements of this article and shall relieve the seller, seller’s agent, and buyer’s agent of any further duty under this article with respect to that item of information.

(c) The delivery of a report or opinion prepared by a licensed engineer, land surveyor, geologist, or expert in natural hazard discovery dealing with matters within the scope of the professional’s license or expertise shall be sufficient compliance for application of the exemption provided by subdivision (a)
 if the information is provided to the prospective buyer pursuant to a request therefor, whether written or oral. In responding to that request, an expert may indicate, in writing, an understanding that the information provided will be used in fulfilling the requirements of Section 1103.2 and, if so, shall indicate the required disclosures, or parts thereof, to which the information being furnished is applicable. Where such a statement is furnished, the expert shall not be responsible for any items of information or parts thereof, other than those expressly set forth in the statement.

(1) In responding to the request, the expert shall determine whether the property is within an airport influence area as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 11010 of the Business and Professions Code. If the property is within an airport influence area, the report shall contain the following statement:NOTICE OF AIRPORT IN VICINITYThis property is presently located in the vicinity of an 
airport, within what is known as an airport influence area. For that 
reason, the property may be subject to some of the annoyances or 
inconveniences associated with proximity to airport operations 
(for example: noise, vibration, or odors). Individual sensitivities 
to those annoyances can vary from person to person. You may wish to 
consider what airport annoyances, if any, are
 associated with the 
property before you complete your purchase and determine whether they 